test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-teeqd_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - tēʼḑ: # Noun 146 'eng /est täht/fin' - full paradigm
     tēʼḑ+N+Sg+Nom: [tēʼḑ, tēḑ]
     tēʼḑ+N+Sg+Gen: [tǟʼd, tǟd]
     tēʼḑ+N+Sg+Par: [tǟʼdtõ, tǟdtõ]
     tēʼḑ+N+Sg+Dat: [tǟʼdõn, tǟdõn]
     tēʼḑ+N+Sg+Ins: [tǟʼdkõks, tǟdkõks]
     tēʼḑ+N+Sg+Ill: [tǟʼdõ, tǟdõ]
     tēʼḑ+N+Sg+Ela: [tǟʼdstõ, tǟdstõ]
     tēʼḑ+N+Pl+Nom: [tǟʼdõd, tǟdõd]
     tēʼḑ+N+Pl+Gen: [tǟʼdõd, tǟdõd]
     tēʼḑ+N+Pl+Par: [tēʼḑi, tēḑi]
     tēʼḑ+N+Pl+Dat: [tǟʼdõdõn, tǟdõdõn]
     tēʼḑ+N+Pl+Ins: [tǟʼdõdõks, tǟdõdõks]
     tēʼḑ+N+Pl+Ill: [tēʼḑiž, tēḑiž]
     tēʼḑ+N+Pl+Ela: [tēʼḑist, tēḑist]
